California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(b) An increase in the tax rate, adopted by the electors’ approval of an ordinance pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 150206, or a decrease in the tax rate adopted by the authority pursuant to Section 150207, shall be operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 120 days after approval by the electors or adoption by the authority, as the case may be.

(c) Prior to the operative date of the ordinance, the authority shall contract with the State Board of Equalization to perform all functions incident to the administration and operation of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150205.

(a) Revenues from the retail transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to this chapter shall be allocated by the authority for public transportation purposes consistent with the expenditure plan referenced in the ordinance imposing the tax. The authority, by a four-fifths vote of its members, may revise that expenditure plan after conducting noticed public hearings on the proposed revision.

(b) The amounts allocated to projects within the county and the city, respectively, shall be proportionate to the revenues derived from the tax collected within each of the respective jurisdictions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150206.

(a) The authority, subject to the approval of the voters, may impose a maximum tax rate of 1 percent under this division and Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and the authority may state the maximum tax rate at 1 percent or one-half of 1 percent. The authority shall not levy the retail transactions and use tax at a rate other than 1 percent or one-half of 1 percent, unless specifically authorized by the Legislature.

(b) The tax rate adopted pursuant to this chapter, unless otherwise prohibited, may be increased by the authority by ordinance adopted in the manner and by the vote stated in Sections 150201 and approved by a majority of the electors voting on the measure at an election called for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150207.

The authority may reduce the tax rate to a percentage lower than that approved by the voters and may further provide for an increase of the tax rate if it has previously been lowered. However, the tax rate may not be increased to a rate above the tax rate approved by the voters.

Any revised tax rate may be adopted only if the authority determines, by a four-fifths vote of its members, that the proceeds of the taxes with the altered tax rate will be sufficient to provide for the payment of the principal of, and interest on, any limited tax bonds and any other indebtedness incurred by the authority which was to be payable from the proceeds of the retail transactions and use tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150208.

(a) A ballot proposition to approve an ordinance for the imposition of a retail transactions and use tax, shall seek authorization to issue bonds payable from the proceeds of the tax and establish the appropriations limit of the authority.

(b) The maximum bonded indebtedness which may be outstanding at any one time shall be an amount equal to the sum of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds, but not to exceed the estimated proceeds of the tax for a period of not more than the number of years for which the tax authorized by this chapter is to be imposed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150209.

(a) The bonds authorized by the voters concurrently with the approval of the retail transactions and use tax may be issued by the authority at any time, and from time to time, payable from the proceeds of the tax. The bonds shall be referred to as “limited tax bonds.” The bonds may be secured by a pledge of revenues from the proceeds of the tax.

(b) The pledge of the tax to the limited tax bonds authorized under this chapter shall have priority over the use of any of the taxes for “pay-as-you-go” financing, except to the extent that the priority is expressly restricted in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150210.

The authority may provide for the bonds to bear a variable interest rate, for the manner and intervals in which the rate shall vary, and for the dates on which the interest shall be payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150211.

Limited tax bonds shall be issued pursuant to a resolution adopted at any time, and from time to time, by the authority by a four-fifths vote of all of its members.

The authority may, from time to time, issue bonds in accordance with the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), for the purposes set forth in the ordinance adopted pursuant to Section 150202, which shall constitute an “enterprise” within the meaning of Section 54309 of the Government Code. Article 3 (commencing with Section 54380) of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code and the limitations on the rate of interest set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 54402 of the Government Code do not apply to the issuance of the sale of bonds pursuant to this division. Instead, the authority shall authorize the issuance of bonds by resolution, which shall specify all of the following:

(a) The purposes for which the bonds are to be issued.

(b) The maximum principal amount of the bonds.

(c) The maximum term for the bonds.

(d) The maximum rate of interest to be payable upon the bonds shall not exceed the maximum rate permitted by Section 53531 of the Government Code or any other applicable provisions of law. In the case of bonds bearing a variable interest rate, the variable rate shall on no day exceed the maximum rate permitted on that day by Section 53531 of the Government Code or any other applicable provisions of law.

(e) The maximum discount on the sale of the bonds. However, the bonds shall not be sold at less than 95 percent of the principal amount in the manner determined by the authority. Each resolution shall provide for the issuance of bonds in the amounts as may be necessary, until the full amount of the bonds authorized has been issued. The full amount of bonds may be divided into two or more series with different dates of payment fixed for the bonds of each series. A bond need not mature on its anniversary date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150212.

Any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter are a legal investment for all trust funds; for the funds of insurance companies, commercial and savings banks, and trust companies; and for state school funds. Whenever any money or funds may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be invested in bonds of cities, counties, school districts, or other districts within this state, that money or funds may be invested in the bonds issued under this chapter, and whenever bonds of cities, counties, school districts, or other districts within this state may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be used as security for the performance of any act or the deposit of any public money, the bonds issued pursuant to this chapter may be so used. The provisions of this chapter are in addition to all other laws relating to legal investment and shall be controlling as the latest expression of the Legislature with respect thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150213.

Any action or proceeding wherein the validity of the adoption of the retail transactions and use tax ordinance provided for in this chapter or the issuance of any bonds thereunder or any of the proceedings in relation thereto is contested, questioned, or denied, shall be commenced within six months from the date of the election at which the ordinance is approved; otherwise, the bonds and all proceedings in relation thereto, including the adoption and approval of the ordinance, shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

150214.

The commission may not impose any tax other than the retail transactions and use tax imposed upon approval of the voters in accordance with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1521, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 16. PENINSULA RAIL TRANSIT DISTRICT [160000. - 160006.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [160000. - 160002.]

160000.

The Peninsula Corridor Study Joint Powers Board, created pursuant to Section 1 of Chapter 1328 of the Statutes of 1987, is hereby redesignated the Peninsula Rail Transit District and, as such, has the additional powers provided for in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 160005).

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1434, Sec. 4.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1434, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

160001.

As used in this division, “district” means the Peninsula Rail Transit District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1434, Sec. 4.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1434, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

160002.

The district board shall be comprised of nine members appointed as follows:

(a) The governing bodies of the municipal railway operated by the City and County of San Francisco, the San Mateo County Transit District, and the Santa Clara County Transit District shall each appoint one member.

(b) The Boards of Supervisors of the City and County of San Francisco, the County of San Mateo, and the County of Santa Clara shall each appoint one member. 

(c) The Mayor of the City and County of San Francisco shall appoint one member.

(d) The city councils of cities within the County of San Mateo, shall jointly appoint one member.

(e) The city councils of cities within the County of Santa Clara shall jointly appoint one member.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1434, Sec. 4.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1434, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Powers of the District [160005. - 160006.]

160005.

In addition to powers delegated to the Peninsula Corridor Study Joint Powers Board by a joint exercise of powers agreement pursuant to Section 1 of Chapter 1328 of the Statutes of 1987, the district has all of the following powers:

(a) To acquire real and personal property of every kind for rail purposes by grant, gift, devise, lease, or eminent domain, and to hold, use, sell, lease, or transfer any such property.

(b) To enter into any contract necessary for its powers.

(c) To establish or change rates, charges, and services. The Public Utilities Commission has no jurisdiction over the district or any of its activities except as to matters of public safety.

(d) To indemnify and defend any railroad corporation, regardless of its negligence, that operates rail services for the district pursuant to contract. 

(e) To appoint an executive officer, and to employ staff and legal counsel.

(f) To sue and be sued.

(g) To indemnify and defend the Department of Transportation with respect to the transfer of rights-of-way, stations, rail passenger equipment, and facilities, and contracts, leases, or agreements relative to those properties whose ownership or responsibility is transferred to the district in accordance with the terms of an agreement to be negotiated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1434, Sec. 4.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1434, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

160006.

(a) If the district acquires stations, facilities, and passenger equipment owned or leased by the Department of Transportation for the passenger rail service provided by the Southern Pacific Transportation Company between San Francisco and San Jose and points in between, and if the district acquires from the Department of Transportation the right-of-way between San Francisco and San Jose presently owned by the Southern Pacific Transportation Company, the district may own, operate, construct, manage, and maintain rights-of-way, stations, facilities, and equipment necessary for the operation of rail passenger and freight services between San Francisco and Alma and points in between, and may contract with any railroad corporation for the purchase of, or to subsidize, service between San Francisco and Alma and points in between. Upon completion of the conditions specified in subdivision (a) of Section 14035.4 of the Government Code, the district may provide commuter rail service between San Jose and Gilroy.

(b) Any assets transferred from the Department of Transportation to the district without compensation shall be transferred with all attendant obligations, liabilities, debts, and grant conditions established by the department, including Urban Mass Transportation Administration grants and sale and leaseback contracts.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1434) by Stats. 1989, Ch. 922, Sec. 3.   Section conditionally operative as prescribed by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1434, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 16.5. STATE TRANSPORTATION CORRIDOR PRESERVATION [161000. - 161031.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [161000. - 161004.]

161000.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(1) Transportation is vital to the state’s economy, and a complete transportation system is essential in times of disaster.

(2) Transportation corridors should be protected from uses which are incompatible with transportation requirements.

(3) Important potential transportation corridors are being developed for other purposes.

(b) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature in enacting this division to vest in the Department of Transportation responsibility for implementing a program of transportation right-of-way protection and conservation within essential transportation corridors by acquiring and holding transportation corridor lands which would otherwise be lost to public use.

(c) It is the further intent of the Legislature in enacting this division to preserve land which is needed or will be needed for transportation corridors consistent with applicable environmental protection laws and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

161001.

As used in this division, “commission” means the California Transportation Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

161002.

As used in this division, “department” means the Department of Transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

161003.

As used in this division, “secretary” means the Secretary of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 510.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

161004.

As used in this division, “transportation corridor” means an area or one or more parcels of land that meets any of the following requirements:

(a) Designated by the commission as necessary under the adopted state transportation improvement plan.

(b) Designated by a transportation planning agency, county transportation commission, or the San Diego County Metropolitan Transit Development Board as necessary under the adopted regional transportation implementation plan.

(c) Within the adopted route of a state highway.

(d) Within the adopted route of a county or city highway or exclusive mass transit guideway which is consistent with the county or city general plan.

(e) Designated by the commission as being within one of two or more proposed routes or alignments for a state highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Duties and Functions [161020. - 161031.]

161020.

The department may apply for and accept federal grants and receive gifts, donations, subventions, rents, royalties, and other financial support from public and private sources for purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

161021.

The department may serve as a repository for lands located within a transportation corridor where the preservation of those lands is required by the department or an agency of local government to meet its transportation policies and objectives, and may accept a dedication of fee title, easements, development rights, or other interest in lands for this purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

161022.

On an annual basis, or as may be otherwise required by the secretary, the department shall report to the secretary regarding privately owned lands determined to have special significance for purposes of preserving a transportation corridor and which might be the subject of an exchange for other state lands. Specific privately owned land shall be included in the report only with the consent of the owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

161023.

The department may acquire land or any interest therein for purposes of this division pursuant to procedures applicable to the acquisition of land by the department or the commission. If other means of acquisition have not been successful, the department may exercise the power of eminent domain for these purposes. The power of eminent domain may only be exercised to acquire land which is necessary for construction of the relevant highway route or guideway alignment, and shall not include land for rest stops or other ancillary uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

161024.

(a) The department may sell, rent, lease, exchange, or otherwise transfer any land or interest therein acquired under this division pursuant to an implementation plan adopted by the department. Any lease entered into under this division shall be for not more than 20 years.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by law or by agreement, the proceeds of the sale, rental, lease, exchange, or transfer of land or interest therein, including any rent or other income from land held by the department, shall be deposited in the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

161025.

The department shall develop and implement procedures to ensure that land acquisition, leasing, options to purchase, disposal, and other transactions in land under this division are carried out efficiently and equitably and with proper notice to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

161027.

(a) The department shall cooperate with federal, state, and local public agencies in ensuring the reservation of lands for transportation purposes. 

(b) If any state or local public agency is unable, due to limited financial resources or other circumstances of a temporary nature, to acquire land for transportation purposes, the department may acquire and hold that land for subsequent conveyance to the public agency. The department may provide technical assistance to aid public agencies in completing those acquisitions and related functions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

161028.

(a) The department shall not hold any land acquired under this division for more than 20 years from the time of acquisition. A state or local public agency may acquire the land at any time during this period for transportation purposes. The acquisition price to a state or local public agency shall be based upon the cost of acquisition under this division plus administrative and management costs in preserving the land. The payment of this acquisition price shall be either monetary or in department-approved land of an equivalent value, or a combination thereof. No land acquired under this section shall be disposed of under Section 11011.1 of the Government Code.

(b) If, at the expiration of a 20-year period, no public agency is willing or able to acquire the land, the department shall dispose of the land at fair market value without restriction on its subsequent use under this division. All proceeds of a disposition under this subdivision shall be deposited in the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

161029.

If the department acquires any land prior to the adoption of a specific route or alignment by the commission, the commission shall disregard that land in the study and adoption of routes and alignments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

161030.

There is hereby appropriated from the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund to the department the amount of the proceeds of all sales, except the proceeds of sales pursuant to Section 14528.8 of the Government Code, leases, and rentals, on and after January 1, 1991, of land acquired by the department for transportation purposes, until a total of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) has been so appropriated, to be expended by the department for the purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 995, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

161031.

The department shall comply with applicable environmental protection laws and regulations when taking any action authorized by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 17. SAN DIEGO COUNTY REGIONAL AIRPORT AUTHORITY [170000. - 170084.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [170000. - 170006.]

170000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the San Diego County Regional Airport Authority Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 946, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

170002.

There is hereby established the San Diego County Regional Airport Authority, as a local governmental entity of regional government, with jurisdiction extending throughout the County of San Diego.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 946, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

170004.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Airports help to link local, regional, statewide, national, and global economic activities. Airports are also essential features of comprehensive transportation systems, that include streets and highways, rail transit, transit over water, and mass transit.

(b) It is essential to the public health, safety, and welfare that airports be developed and operated in the San Diego County region so that those airports promote economic development, protect environmental quality, and enhance social equity.

(c) The significant regional consequences of airport planning, development, and operations require the creation of a regional airport authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 83, Sec. 1.   (AB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

170006.

For the purposes of this division, the following terms have the following meanings, unless the context requires otherwise.

(a) The “authority” means the San Diego County Regional Airport Authority established under this division.

(b) The “board” and “board of directors” means the governing board of the authority established as specified in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 170010).

(c) The “consolidated agency” means the authority resulting from the consolidation of the San Diego Association of Governments and the transit boards pursuant to
 Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 132350) of Division 12.7.

(d) The “east county cities” means the Cities of El Cajon, La Mesa, Lemon Grove, and Santee.

(e) The “north county coastal cities” means the Cities of Carlsbad, Del Mar, Encinitas, Oceanside, and Solana Beach.

(f) The “north county inland cities” means the Cities of Escondido, Poway, San Marcos, and Vista.

(g) The “port” means the San Diego Unified Port District established under the San Diego Unified Port District Act (Chapter 67 of the Statutes of 1962, First Extraordinary Session).

(h) The “San Diego International Airport” means the airport located
 at Lindbergh Field in the County of San Diego.

(i) The “south county cities” means the Cities of Chula Vista, Coronado, Imperial Beach, and National City.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (AB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Governing Body [170010. - 170026.]

170010.

(a) (1) The board of directors shall consist of nine voting members, appointed as follows:

(A) The Mayor of the City of San Diego shall appoint three persons, two of whom shall be subject to confirmation by the City Council of the City of San Diego. The persons appointed pursuant to
 this paragraph shall be residents of the City of San Diego and not less than one shall be an elected official of the City of San Diego. For purposes of this subdivision, an “elected official of the City of San Diego” means the Mayor or a member of the City Council of the City of San Diego.

(B) The Chair of the Board of Supervisors of the County of San Diego shall appoint two persons, subject to confirmation by the Board of Supervisors of the County of San Diego. The persons appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall be residents of the County of San Diego and not less than one shall be a member
 of the Board of Supervisors of the County of San Diego.

(C) At a public meeting, the mayors of the east county cities shall appoint one person pursuant to a majority vote of the mayors of the east county cities. The person appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall be a member of a city council of one of the east county cities or another resident of one of the east county cities.

(D) At a public meeting, the mayors of the north county coastal cities shall appoint one person pursuant to a majority vote of the mayors of the north county coastal cities. The person appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall be a member of a city council of one of the north county coastal cities or another resident of one of the north county coastal cities.

(E) At a public meeting, the mayors of the north county inland cities shall appoint one person pursuant to a majority vote of the mayors of the north county inland cities. The person appointed pursuant to this paragraph
 shall be a member of a city council of one of the north county inland cities or another resident of one of the north county inland cities.

(F) At a public meeting, the mayors of the south county cities shall appoint one person pursuant to a majority vote of the mayors of the south county cities. The person appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall be a member of a city council of one of the south county cities or another resident of one of the south county cities.

(2) Public meetings convened pursuant to subparagraphs (C) to (F), inclusive, of paragraph (1) shall be publicly noticed by the authority and by each of the cities whose mayor is eligible to participate in the meeting. These meetings are subject to the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code) and shall be conducted by the authority clerk who shall record the minutes of the
 meeting.

(3) The authority may issue guidance to cities concerning the appointment process.

(b) The following persons shall be nonvoting, noncompensated, ex officio members of the board of directors, appointed by the Governor:

(1) The District Director of the Department of Transportation for the San Diego region.

(2) The Department of Finance representative on the State Lands Commission.

(c) The board of directors may provide for additional nonvoting, noncompensated members of the board of directors, including
 representatives of the United States Navy and the United States Marine Corps, each of whom may appoint an alternate to serve in his or her place.

(d) The Mayor of the City of San Diego shall appoint the chair of the authority board of directors from among the nine voting members of the board of directors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 83, Sec. 3.   (AB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

170011.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 170010 , the term of office of a member of the board of directors appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 170010 is three years. A member of the board of directors may continue to serve beyond the expiration of the term until his or her successor qualifies for appointment and takes office. Following appointment, a member of the board of directors shall take office at 12:01 a.m.
 on February 1 of the year in which the appointment commences. If a board appointment is made after February 1 of the year in which the member’s term is scheduled to commence, the member shall take office immediately upon appointment and, if applicable, after receiving confirmation, to serve the remainder of the term.

(b) If a member of the board of directors is appointed to be a member as a result of holding another public office and that person no longer holds that other public office, then that person shall no longer serve on the board of directors and a vacancy shall exist.

(c) Any vacancy in the office of a member of the board of directors shall be filled promptly
 pursuant to Section 1779 of the Government Code.

(d) Any person appointed to fill a vacant office shall serve the balance of the unexpired term. If a member of the board of directors leaves office prior to the expiration of his or her term, the vacancy shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 170010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 83, Sec. 4.   (AB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

170012.

(a) At the first meeting of the board of directors on or after February 1 of each even-numbered year, the board of directors shall meet and elect its officers, except for the chair of the board of directors, who shall be appointed by the Mayor of the City of San Diego.

(b) The officers of the board of directors are a chair, vice chair, and those additional officers created by the board of directors pursuant
 to subdivision (c). The chair shall preside over meetings of the board of directors and the vice chair shall serve during the chair’s absence or inability to serve.

(c) The board of directors may create additional offices and elect members to those offices, provided that no member of the board of directors shall hold more than one office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 83, Sec. 5.   (AB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

170013.

(a) The board of directors shall govern the authority.

(b) The board of directors shall establish policies for the operation of the authority. The board of directors shall provide for the implementation of those policies which are the responsibility of the authority’s chief executive officer.

(c) All members of the board of directors shall exercise their independent judgment on behalf of the interests of the residents, property owners, and the public within San Diego County as a whole in furthering the purposes and intent of this division. The members of the board of directors shall represent
 the interests of the public as a whole and not solely the interests of the local officials who appointed them to the board of directors.

(d) The board of directors shall have a three-member executive committee. One member of the executive committee shall be a board member selected from among those members appointed by the Mayor of the City of San Diego pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170010 (category 1). One member of the executive committee shall be a board member appointed by the Chair of the Board of Supervisors of the County of San Diego pursuant to
 subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170010 (category 2). One member of the executive committee shall be a board member selected from among those members appointed pursuant to subparagraphs (C) to (F), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170010 (category 3). Additionally, members of the executive committee shall be the following:

(1) The chair of the authority’s board of directors pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 170010.

(2) The vice chair of the authority’s board of directors, appointed from
 a category different than the chair.

(3) A third member of the board of directors appointed from a category that is not represented on the executive committee as a result of paragraphs (1) and (2).

(4) The members of the executive committee serving pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) shall each be selected to serve by a vote of the members of the board of directors.

(e) The board of directors shall appoint a seven-member audit committee consisting of four members of the board of directors and the three public members appointed pursuant to Section 170018.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 83, Sec. 6.   (AB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

170014.

(a) Meetings of the board of directors are subject to the provisions of the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(b) A majority of the total voting membership of the board of directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(c) The board of directors shall act only by ordinance, resolution, or motion.

(d) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (e), to adopt an ordinance, resolution, or motion requires
 both a numerical and a weighted majority vote of the total voting membership of the board of directors pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3).

(2) A numerical majority requires an affirmative vote of at least five of the voting membership of the board of directors.

(3) (A) A weighted majority requires an affirmative vote of at least 51 vote points that are allocated to the voting membership of the board of directors, unless the total number of vote points is expanded beyond 100 as a result of the operation of subparagraph (E). If the total number of vote points is greater than 100 as a result of the operation of subparagraph (E), a weighted majority requires an affirmative vote of at least 50 percent plus one of the total vote points. Vote points shall be allocated
 pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(B) There shall be a total of 100 allocated vote points for the weighted vote, except that additional vote points shall be allocated pursuant to subparagraph (E). For purposes of this paragraph, the City of San Diego, the County of San Diego, the east county cities, the north county coastal cities, the north county inland cities, and the south county cities are each a jurisdiction. The points allocated to the City of San Diego shall be divided among the three board members appointed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 170010. The points shall be allocated among the three board members by the Mayor of the City of San Diego, keeping the votes for each seat as close to equal as possible but in a manner that avoids fractional vote points. The vote points allocated to the County of
 San Diego shall be divided between the two board members appointed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 170010. The vote points shall be allocated among the two board members by the chair of the board of supervisors, keeping the votes for each seat as close to equal as possible but in a manner that avoids fractional vote points. Each jurisdiction shall have that number of vote points determined by the following allocation formula, except that each jurisdiction shall have at least one vote point, no jurisdiction shall have more than 40 vote points, and there shall be no fractional vote points:

(i) If any jurisdiction has 40 percent or more of the total population of the San Diego County region, 40 vote points shall be allocated to that jurisdiction and the remaining vote points shall be allocated to the remaining
 jurisdictions pursuant to clause (ii). If no jurisdiction has 40 percent or more of the total population of the San Diego County region, vote points shall be allocated pursuant to clause (iii).

(ii) The total population of the remaining jurisdictions shall be computed and the remaining 60 vote points allocated based upon the percentage of the total that each jurisdiction has, in the following manner:

(I) The percentage each jurisdiction bears to the total remaining population shall be multiplied by 60 to determine fractional shares.

(II) Each fraction less than one shall be rounded up to one, so that no jurisdiction has less than one vote point.

(III) Disregarding any fractional vote points and adding just the whole vote points, if the total vote points is 60, fractional vote points are dropped and the whole numbers are the vote points for each jurisdiction.

(IV) If, after disregarding the fractional vote points and adding just the whole vote points, the total vote points for the remaining jurisdictions is less than 60, the difference in vote points shall be allocated to jurisdictions in order of the highest fractions until a total of 60 vote points are allocated, excepting those jurisdictions whose vote was increased to one pursuant to subclause (II).

(V) If, after disregarding the fractional vote points and adding just the whole vote points, the total vote points for the remaining jurisdictions is more than 60, the
 vote points in excess of 60 shall be eliminated by subtracting vote points from jurisdictions with the lowest percentage to the total remaining population except that no jurisdiction’s vote points shall be reduced to less than one.

(iii) If no jurisdiction has 40 percent or more of the total population of the San Diego County region, the total population of the region shall be computed and all 100 vote points shall be allocated based upon the percentage each jurisdiction bears to the total population of the region, in the following manner:

(I) The percentage of any jurisdiction that is less than one shall be rounded up to one, so that no jurisdiction has less than one vote point.

(II) Disregarding any fractional vote
 points and adding just the whole vote points, if the total vote points is 100, fractional vote points shall be dropped and the whole numbers shall be the vote points for each jurisdiction.
